District of Columbia statutes.
10-1008

Repealed

Criteria for Council review and approval of certain contracts.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806c
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-238, § 2(b), 51 DCR 10599
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).